Utah statutes.
31A-1-202.   Effect of repeal of former provisions.

(1)  The repeal of any statute by this title does not affect any right accrued or established, or any liability or penalty incurred under the repealed statute.

(2)  An action or proceeding commenced under any law repealed by this title is not affected by the repeal.   However, all procedures followed or sanctions imposed after the repeal of Title 31 shall conform to this title as far as possible.

